Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 2
CAMPFIRES - EXTINGUISHING

30-15-201. Penalty for leaving campfire unattended.

Any person who starts or maintains a campfire commits the offense of leaving a campfire unattended if he or she knowingly or recklessly:

Fails to reasonably attend the campfire at all times; or

Fails to thoroughly extinguish the campfire before leaving the site.

A person who commits the offense of leaving a campfire unattended commits a petty offense.

A person who commits the offense of leaving a campfire unattended where the campfire is located in a forested or grassland area commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2018.)

Source:

L. 1885:

p. 161, § 1.

L. 1891:

p. 115, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1227.

C.L.

§ 8704.

CSA:

C. 45, § 51.

CRS 53:

§ 36-14-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-14-1.

L. 73:

p. 1402, § 27.

L. 74:

(1) amended, p. 407, § 21, effective April 11.

L. 84:

(1) amended, p. 924, § 18, effective May 11.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 1247, § 21, effective August 7.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1051), ch. 57, p. 598, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(1)(b) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3248, § 502, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For transfer of duties of the state board of forestry to the state board of agriculture, see part 2 of article 31 of title 23; for unlawful acts concerning fires, see § 33-15-106.

30-15-202. Penalty for defacing or destroying notices.

Any person who willfully destroys, removes, injures, or defaces any such notice erected on any such highway, or willfully injures or defaces any inscription or device comprising such notice, commits a petty offense.

Source:

L. 1885:

p. 162, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 1228.

C.L.

§ 8705.

CSA:

C. 45, § 52.

CRS 53:

§ 36-14-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-14-2.

L. 64:

p. 223, § 54.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3248, § 503, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For the provision in the criminal code concerning the defacing of a posted notice, see § 18-4-510.